Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3201
Investment of funds; prudent investor rule.

Except as may be otherwise provided in section 8-318, or otherwise provided by law or by the instrument creating the fiduciary relationship involved, each and every trustee, guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator, whether appointed by the courts of this state, or acting under authority other than a court appointment, having funds for investment shall comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in sections 30-3883 to 30-3889.

Laws 1933, c. 64, § 1, p. 299;

Laws 1935, c. 68, § 1, p. 245;

Laws 1937, c. 60, § 1, p. 237;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-601;

Laws 1943, c. 66, § 1, p. 242;

R.S.1943, § 24-601;

Laws 1945, c. 56, § 1, p. 243;

Laws 1947, c. 79, § 1, p. 248;

Laws 1953, c. 67, § 2, p. 213;

Laws 1955, c. 82, § 1, p. 238;

Laws 1959, c. 263, § 9, p. 931;

Laws 1963, c. 134, § 1, p. 505;

Laws 1965, c. 113, § 1, p. 438;

Laws 1975, LB 481, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-601;

Laws 1997, LB 54, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 134.

Inherent jurisdiction of district court over trusts conferred by the Constitution is not affected by this section. John A. Creighton Home v. Waltman, 140 Neb. 3, 299 N.W. 261 (1941).